Washington statutes.
RCW 19.330.090

Third parties—Time for award of damages.

A court may not enforce an award of damages against a third party pursuant to RCW 19.330.060(2) for a period of eighteen months from July 22, 2011.

[ 2011 c 98 s 9.]